Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2152YC (2) 91 lh/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 147.1, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. A statewide nonprofit organization that 3 is an organ procurement organization, as âorgan procurement 4 organizationâ is defined in section 142C.1. 5